Nebraska, session 109, LB1044.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1044 LB1044
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 81-12,155, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
81-12,155 In selecting projects to receive financial assistance
under the Business Innovation Act, the department shall develop a
qualified action plan by January 1 of each even-numbered year. The plan
shall set forth selection criteria to be used to determine priorities
which are appropriate to local conditions and the state's economy,
including the state's immediate need for innovation development, proposed
increases in jobs and investment, private dollars leveraged, industry
support and participation, and repayment, in part or in whole, of
financial assistance awarded under the act. The department shall submit
the plan to the Governor for approval.
Sec. 2. Section 81-12,158, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-12,158 (1) The department shall establish a financial assistance
program to provide financial assistance to businesses that employ no more
than five hundred employees or to individuals for the purposes of
creating a prototype of a product stemming from research and development
at a business operating in Nebraska or a public or private college or
university in Nebraska.
(2)(a) Until three months after April 20, 2022, funds shall be
matched by nonstate funds equivalent in money equal to fifty percent of
the funds requested; and
(b) Beginning three months after April 20, 2022, funds shall be
matched by nonstate funds equivalent in money equal to:
(i) Twenty-five percent of the funds requested if the applicant's
principal residence or principal place of business is located in an
economic redevelopment area within a city of the metropolitan class; or
(ii) Fifty percent of the funds requested for any other applicant.
(3) Matching funds may be from any nonstate source, including
private foundations, federal or local government sources, quasi-
-2-

LB1044 LB1044
2026 2026
governmental entities, or commercial lending institutions, or any other
funds whose source does not include funds appropriated by the
Legislature.
(4) The amount the department may provide shall not exceed one
hundred fifty thousand dollars per project.
(5) A business or individual applying for financial assistance under
this section shall include a business plan that includes a proof-of-
concept demonstration.
(6) Financial assistance under this section shall be expended within
twenty-four months after the date of the awarding decision.
(7) The department shall award at least four million dollars per
year and may award up to six million dollars per year for financial
assistance under this section.
Sec. 3. Section 81-12,160, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-12,160 (1) The department shall establish a financial assistance
program to provide financial assistance to businesses operating in
Nebraska that employ no more than five hundred employees or to
individuals that have a prototype of a product or process for the
purposes of commercializing such product or process. The applicant shall
submit a feasibility study stating the potential sales and profit
projections for the product or process.
(2) The department shall create a program with the following
provisions to support commercialization of a product or process:
(a) Commercialization infrastructure documentation, including market
assessments and start-up strategic planning;
(b) Promotion, marketing, advertising, and consulting;
(c) Management and business planning support;
(d) Linking companies and entrepreneurs to mentors;
(e) Preparing companies and entrepreneurs to acquire venture
capital; and
-3-

LB1044 LB1044
2026 2026
(f) Linking companies to sources of capital.
(3) Funds shall be matched by nonstate funds equal to fifty percent
of the funds requested. Matching funds may be from any nonstate source,
including private foundations, federal or local government sources,
quasi-governmental entities, or commercial lending institutions, or any
other funds whose source does not include funds appropriated by the
Legislature.
(4) The department shall not provide more than five hundred thousand
dollars to any one project. Each year the department shall award at least
four million dollars and may award up to six million dollars under this
section.
(5) Financial assistance provided under this section shall be
expended within twenty-four months after the date of the awarding
decision.
(6) To carry out this section, the department shall contract with
one statewide venture development organization that is incorporated in
the State of Nebraska and exempt for federal tax purposes under section
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.
Sec. 4. Section 81-12,163, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-12,163 (1) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate
fifteen million dollars to the department for fiscal year 2026-27 and
each fiscal year thereafter for purposes of carrying out the Business
Innovation Act.
(2) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that (a) the four
million dollars saved due to the elimination of funding for the Angel
Investment Tax Credit Act be used to increase the appropriation to the
department for the Business Innovation Act by four million dollars for
fiscal year 2021-22 and each fiscal year thereafter and (b) the one
hundred thousand dollars saved due to the reduction in tax credits
authorized under the Angel Investment Tax Credit Act for calendar year
-4-

LB1044 LB1044
2026 2026
2019 be used to increase the appropriation to the Department of Revenue
by one hundred thousand dollars for fiscal year 2019-20 to offset the
costs incurred by the Department of Revenue to implement Laws 2019,
LB334.
(3) (2) Up to five percent of the funds appropriated for the
Business Innovation Act may be used by the department, or by a nonprofit
entity with which the department contracts, for administrative expenses.
Sec. 5. Original sections 81-12,155, 81-12,158, 81-12,160, and
81-12,163, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
Sec. 6. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-5-